Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 20. Government Departments

§ 9-2-2001.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 69, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to the transfer of duties of the department of commerce, see §§ 9-2-2008(e) and

9-2-2017

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 140, § 1, related to the department of commerce.

§ 9-2-2002.
Department of employment created; director appointed; structure; merger with department of workforce services.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 1, § 2.

On or before July 1, 2011, all divisions, programs and functions of the department of employment shall be transferred to the department of workforce services created by W.S.

9-2-2601

. The combined department shall be known as the department of workforce services. Any statute or legal or other document which refers to the department of employment shall mean the department of workforce services which is the successor agency to the department of employment.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 139, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 4; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2011, ch. 49, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 2.

The 2008 amendment

substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708” in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

added (h).

Laws 2011, ch. 49 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, repealed former (a) through (g) pertaining to obsolete provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989.

Privatization of administrative functions. —

Laws 1993, ch. 179, § 1 directs the director of the department of employment to determine administrative functions of worker's compensation and unemployment insurance divisions appropriate for a privatization and grants contracting authority to the director to enter into appropriate private sector contracts.

Stated

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Garl, 2001 WY 59, 26 P.3d 1029,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 9-2-2003.
Department of audit created; director appointed; structure; authority; reporting.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created a department of audit consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by a majority of the governor, secretary of state and state treasurer with the advice and consent of the senate. The director shall serve for a term of six (6) years and may be removed by a majority of those officials appointing him only for misfeasance, malfeasance or nonfeasance in office. The initial appointment shall be made not later than July 1, 1989 and shall expire on March 1, 1991.

The director shall prepare a plan for reorganization of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section and submit it to the governor for approval. The department reorganization plan, as approved, shall be submitted to the joint appropriations committee and joint revenue interim committee of the legislature and made available to the public. Each committee shall hold at least one (1) public hearing regarding the plan before the 1990 budget session of the legislature convenes. The plan, as approved by act of the legislature, shall be implemented not later than July 1, 1990. The reorganization plan required under this section shall include the public lands loan and grant examination function within the office of the commissioner of public lands. The Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989 applies to the development and presentation of the plan required under this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, the department of audit shall commence operations on July 1, 1989. The department shall consist of the office of the state examiner and staff of the department of revenue and taxation and the state auditor’s office transferred to the department of audit by this act. The director of the department, with the approval of the governor, shall structure the department in as similar a manner as practicable to other departments created in accordance with the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of audit is authorized to conduct audits for the collection of federal and state mineral royalties and for collection of taxes imposed under Title 39, Wyoming Statutes, and may exercise the same authority with respect to audits that the state auditor and the department of revenue and taxation did on June 30, 1989.

When in the course of an audit of state or federal mineral royalties the department discovers underpayment of private mineral royalties to a Wyoming royalty owner, it shall report the underpayment to the royalty owner if ascertainable.

In addition to the other powers and duties granted by law, either express or implied, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

To coordinate the auditing of state taxes, state royalties, federal mineral royalties and other revenue matters;

To prescribe reasonable rules and regulations as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

, which are no more stringent nor require more record keeping than the provisions of any or all tax, royalty and other revenue measures which are administered by the state of Wyoming;

To conduct audits at the request of any state agency, of persons or any other entity providing goods or services or both, to the state of Wyoming under contract. However, the audits shall be limited to matters within the scope of the contract;

To request the attorney general to issue investigative subpoenas relating to an audit for the following purposes:

To subpoena witnesses to appear before the department auditors for oral examination;

To require the production or disclosure of any matter relevant to the investigation or review including:

The existence, description, nature, custody, condition and location of any books, documents, records or other tangible material; and

The identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of evidence necessary or related to the financial investigation or review.

If any tangible materials subpoenaed under paragraph (g)(iv) of this section are located outside of this state, the person to whom the subpoena is issued shall make the materials available to the department auditors at a convenient location. If any party fails or refuses to obey a subpoena or to provide testimony as required under paragraph (g)(iv) of this section, the attorney general may, upon reasonable notice to all affected persons, apply to the district court for an order compelling compliance.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the issuance of a subpoena pursuant to paragraph (g)(iv) of this section, the attorney general shall disclose to the party or parties investigated that the investigation took place and the reasons for it.

The director shall:

Make a full report of any investigation conducted under paragraph (g)(iv) and subsection (h) of this section;

Maintain the report made under paragraph (i) of this subsection in his files;

Annually report to the joint revenue interim committee and the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee on the number, location by county and general extent of the investigations.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 210, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The reference to “this act” in the second sentence in subsection (d) means Laws 1989, ch. 210, §§ 1 through 4, which appear as §§

9-1-403

and

9-2-2003

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Guthrie, 2005 WY 79, 115 P.3d 1086,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(2005).

§ 9-2-2004.
Department of transportation created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of transportation consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section. The provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section except as otherwise provided in this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor.

The following agencies are assigned to the department of transportation under a Type 1 transfer:

Aeronautics commission;

Highway commission, including the highway department and the state highway patrol.

The department reorganization plan shall consider whether the following functions or programs should be assigned from or to the agency or department specified under a Type 2 transfer:

PROGRAM; FROM; TO

Transportation division; PSC; Transportation

All of the driver control sections and driver testing and ports of entry section, that portion of the policy division related to transportation and that portion of the licensing section related to motor vehicles and drivers; DRT; Transportation

As used in this section:

“PSC” means the public service commission;

“DRT” means the department of revenue and taxation;

“Transportation” means the department of transportation created under this act.

Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iv), the highway commission and aeronautics commission shall continue to exercise full authority under current law until specifically altered by a plan for reorganization of the department of transportation approved by the legislature.

In developing the plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii), the director shall consider:

The extent of the authority of citizen commissions over the department;

The extent to which the budget of the department should be subject to the statutory budget process;

Whether the department should contain a functional unit primarily responsible to provide assistance, training and technical support to local units of government;

Preparing a comprehensive statewide transportation plan to develop and maintain a comprehensive system encompassing all modes of transportation;

What functions should be transferred to or created in the department to insure that it is the department dealing with rail transportation.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 61, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; ch. 116, §
1.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 44, §
1, in (b), deleted “not later than July 1, 1990” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second through sixth sentences which pertained to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, §
1, substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708” in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As used in this section, “this act” means Laws 1990, ch. 61, § 1.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Study Authorized. —

Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 3, provides: “The department of transportation shall conduct a cost allocation study and submit a report to the joint transportation and highways interim committee no later than October 1, 1999, and every ten (10) years thereafter, with respect to the effect that various classes of vehicular traffic cause on interstate, primary and secondary highways in the state, taking into consideration the relative weights of the types of vehicles, miles traveled on interstate, primary and secondary roads, amounts and costs of fuels consumed by each, the amount of vehicle fees paid by each and the damage caused by type of vehicle.”

§ 9-2-2005.
Department of health created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of health consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section. The provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor.

The following agencies are assigned to the department of health under a Type 1 transfer:

Division of health and medical services, department of health and social services;

Division of community programs, department of health and social services excluding the Wyoming Indian Affairs Council which is transferred to the governor’s office;

Commission on aging;

The following state institutions:

Wyoming state hospital;

Wyoming life resource center;

Wyoming pioneer home;

Veterans’ home of Wyoming;

Wyoming retirement center.

The department reorganization plan shall consider whether the following functions or programs should be assigned from or to the agency or department specified under a Type 2 transfer:

PROGRAM; FROM; TO

Homemaker program; DPASS; Health

Health entitlement programs; DPASS; Health

As used in this section:

“DPASS” means the division of public assistance and social services within the department of health and social services as it existed before this act;

“Health” means the department of health created under this act.

In developing the plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii), the director shall consider:

A structure to provide a continuum of care for the elderly, developmentally delayed and persons requiring mental health services;

Ensuring independence of the facility inspection function from institutions within the department;

Coordination or consolidation of environmental health functions currently performed by the department of environmental quality;

Coordination or consolidation of food inspection functions currently performed by the department of agriculture;

Elimination or reduction of inspection functions which duplicate inspection functions performed by other state or federal agencies.

The board of land commissioners shall direct, subject to the limitations contained in the constitution of the state of Wyoming, applicable state and federal law and the conveyance instrument, the control, leasing, exchange, care and disposal of all acquired institutional lands not directly utilized for departmental purposes that are managed or associated with the institutions set forth in W.S. 9-2-2005(c) whether held in the name of the state or in the name of the department. Any amount received from transactions involving these lands shall be credited as directed by state or federal law or the conveyance instrument.

All acquired institutional lands managed by the board of land commissioners subject to subsection (g) of this section shall be managed consistent with:

Consideration of the needs of the institution;

Consideration of alternative uses of the property which are compatible with the mission of the institution; and

Limitations contained in the constitution of the state of Wyoming, state and federal law and the conveyance instrument.

The board of land commissioners shall consult with the local officials or governing body having regulatory authority over the acquired institutional lands prior to authorizing the use or transfer of acquired institutional lands managed under subsection (g) of this section to another agency or department of the state of Wyoming.

As used in this section, "acquired institutional lands" means state lands acquired by the state for the benefit of state institutions, but shall not include school trust lands or other lands held in trust by the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 35, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; ch. 85, 1; 2013 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of state institutions, see §

25-1-201

.

As to Wyoming state training school, see §

25-5-103

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 44, §
1, in (b), deleted “not later than July 1, 1990” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second through sixth sentences, pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 85, §
1, effective July 1, 2008, substituted “life resource center” for “state training school” in (c)(iv)(B).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (g) to (k).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 155, §
2,
directs: “The director of the office of state lands,
in consultation
with the directors of the departments of corrections,
family services
and health shall submit a report to the board of
land commissioners
and the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim
committee identifying lands that will be managed
by the board of land
commissioners pursuant to this act by October
1, 2013. The report
shall also identify the potential best use for
each managed property
consistent with the management considerations
required by this act.”

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As used in this section, “this act” means Laws 1990, ch. 35, § 1.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-2006.
Department of family services created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of family services consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section. The provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor.

The following agencies are assigned to the department of family services under a Type 1 transfer:

Division of public assistance and social services, department of health and social services, less programs transferred to other departments under a Type 2 transfer as part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government;

The following state institutions:

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 7, § 2.

Wyoming boys’ school;

Wyoming girls’ school.

In developing the plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii), the director shall consider:

A youth services plan ensuring a continuum of care is available for troubled youth;

Development of case management and management information systems;

Ensuring independence of the facility inspection function from institutions within the department.

The board of land commissioners shall direct, subject to the limitations contained in the constitution of the state of Wyoming, applicable state and federal law and the conveyance instrument, the control, leasing, exchange, care and disposal of all acquired institutional lands not directly utilized for departmental purposes that are managed or associated with the institutions set forth in W.S. 9-2-2006(c) whether held in the name of the state or in the name of the department. Any amount received from transactions involving these lands shall be credited as directed by state or federal law or the conveyance instrument.

All acquired institutional lands managed by the board of land commissioners subject to subsection (e) of this section shall be managed consistent with:

Consideration of the needs of the institution;

Consideration of alternative uses of the property which are compatible with the mission of the institution; and

Limitations contained in the constitution of the state of Wyoming, state and federal law and the conveyance instrument.

The board of land commissioners shall consult with the local officials or governing body having regulatory authority over the acquired institutional lands prior to authorizing the use or transfer of acquired institutional lands managed under subsection (e) of this section to another agency or department of the state of Wyoming.

As used in this section, "acquired institutional lands" means state lands acquired by the state for the benefit of state institutions, but shall not include school trust lands or other lands held in trust by the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 35, § 1; 1998, ch. 7, § 2; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2013 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to department of health, see §§

9-2-101

,

9-2-2005

. As to establishment of state institutions, see §

25-1-201

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

in (b), deleted “not later than July 1, 1990” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second through sixth sentences, pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e) to (h).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 155, §
2,
directs: “The director of the office of state lands,
in consultation
with the directors of the departments of corrections,
family services
and health shall submit a report to the board of
land commissioners
and the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim
committee identifying lands that will be managed
by the board of land
commissioners pursuant to this act by October
1, 2013. The report
shall also identify the potential best use for
each managed property
consistent with the management considerations
required by this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Davidson v. Sherman, 848 P.2d 1341,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 9-2-2007.
Department of revenue created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of revenue consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section. The provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor.

The following agencies are assigned to the department of revenue under a Type 1 transfer:

Department of revenue and taxation, less:

Programs transferred to other departments under a Type 2 transfer as part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government;

The state board of equalization; and

The state tax commission.

The Wyoming liquor commission.

The reorganization plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii) shall provide that the state board of equalization and tax commission shall be separate from the department. In developing the reorganization plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii), the director shall consider in consultation with the state board of equalization and the state tax commission administrative support requirements of the state board of equalization and the state tax commission.

In developing the reorganization plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii), the director shall consider the transfer of the mineral audit division from the department of audit to the department of revenue.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 34, § 1; 1996, ch. 74, § 2; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state auditor and treasurer, see §

9-1-401

. As to department of revenue and taxation, see §§

39-11-101

through

39-11-111

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

in (b), deleted “not later than July 1, 1990” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second through sixth sentences, pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Antelope Valley Imp. & Serv. Dist. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 992 P.2d 563,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 9-2-2008.
Department of administration and information created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of administration and information consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section. The provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor.

The following agencies are assigned to the department of administration and information under a Type 1 transfer:

Department of administration and fiscal control;

State library.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 55, § 3.

The following functions or programs shall be transferred from the department of commerce to the department of administration and information under a Type 3 transfer:

Board of certified public accountants;

Board of architects;

Board of barber examiners;

Board of chiropractic examiners;

Board of cosmetology;

Board of dental examiner;

Board of embalming;

Board of hearing aid specialists;

Board of medical examiners;

Board of nursing;

Board of nursing home administrators;

Board of examiners in optometry;

Gaming commission;

Board of pharmacy;

Board of physical therapy;

Board of registration in podiatry;

Mental health professions licensing board;

Board of psychology;

Board of radiologic technologists examiners;

Real estate commission;

Board of examiners for speech pathology and audiology;

Board of veterinary medicine;

The Wyoming professional teaching standards board;

The Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides;

The board of occupational therapy;

The Wyoming board of professional geologists.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 33, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2001, ch. 55, § 3; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to state librarian, see §§

9-2-1026

.6 and

9-2-1026

.7.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted the former last sentence in (b), which read: “Pending adoption of the plan, the state library, archives, museums and historical board shall have authority within the department of administration for administration of the state library.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

in (b), deleted “not later than July 1, 1990” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second through seventh sentences pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2020 amendment,

in (e)(xiii) substituted “Gaming commission” for “Pari-mutuel commission.”

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

Transfer of state employees' and officials' group insuranceboard of administration. —

See note under same catchline following §

9-3-204

.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-2009.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 42, § 4; ch. 55, § 4; ch. 60, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 253, § 1, related to the department of natural resources.

§ 9-2-2010.
Game and fish department created; director appointed.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming game and fish department consisting of the existing Wyoming game and fish commission and department, and all programs and functions specified in title 23 and otherwise under law. Except for W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(v), (viii) and (ix) and

9-2-1705

through

9-2-1707

, the provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three (3) qualified candidates submitted by the game and fish commission. Any appointment under this subsection shall be with the advice and consent of the senate.

The department shall not be subject to a transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A reorganization plan shall not be required of the director.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 253, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-2011.
Department of the state engineer created; director appointed.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of the state engineer consisting of the existing Wyoming office of the state engineer and board of control, and all programs and functions specified in title 41 and otherwise under law relating to the state engineer and board of control. Except for W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(v), (viii) and (ix) and

9-2-1705

through

9-2-1707

, the provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head and director of the department shall be the state engineer.

The department shall not be subject to a transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A reorganization plan shall not be required of the director.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 253, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. July 1, 2007, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708” in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”